Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.070

Record of hearings.

The chief administrative law judge may establish a method of making a record of all hearings and may employ or contract in order to implement such method.

[ 1981 c 67 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.